Arkansas, session 2025, SB128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) Medical Center CEO 1 $685,678
(2) Chancellor 1 $483,460
(3) Provost 1 $466,687
(4) Vice Chancellor 12 $394,409
(5) Associate Provost 3 $385,869
*HAR039*
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
(6) Associate Vice Chancellor 11 $385,868
(7) Dean 8 $385,868
(8) Executive Associate Dean 6 $377,829
(9) Campus Director 28 $353,712
(10) Associate Dean 18 $337,635
(11) Assistant Vice Chancellor 16 $321,557
(12) Assistant Provost 3 $321,556
(13) Assistant Dean 11 $289,401
(14) Area Director 8 $244,065
(15) Director Poison & Drug Information 1 $243,520
(16) Compliance Officer 46 $223,482
(17) Divisional/Departmental Management Pool 864
Executive Divisional Director $297,440
Divisional Director $257,245
Associate Divisional Director $209,012
Assistant Divisional Director $184,895
Departmental Director $184,895
Assoc. Departmental Director $168,817
Departmental Manager $162,386
Asst. Departmental Director $136,662
Asst. Departmental Manager $121,239
(18) Project/Program Administrator 1,129
Executive Project/Program Director $207,294
Exec. Project/Program Manager $181,097
Sr. Project/Program Director $167,382
Project/Program Director $135,750
Project/Program Manager $123,020
Project/Program Specialist $106,139
Executive Assistant $99,405
(19) IT Pool 37
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(20) Kids First / Headstart Pool 78
Social Services Consultant $127,172
Pediatric Nutrition Consultant III $127,172
Pediatric Nutrition Consultant II $109,027
Early Childhood Spec. Educator II $108,951
Site Manager I $106,139
Certified Classroom Teacher $100,807
Pediatric Nutrition Consultant I $99,507
Pediatric Motor Development Consult. $96,050
RN Clinical Coordinator $94,592
Early Childhood Spec. Educator I $88,731
Family Enrichment Specialist I $76,627
(21) Biological Safety Officer 4 $106,311
(22) Fiscal Support Pool 50
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(23) Public Safety Pool 82
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(24) Department Business Coordinator 28 $78,713
(25) Skilled Trades Pool 169
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(26) Occupational Safety Coordinator 7 $69,975
(27) Print Shop Manager 1 $69,975
(28) Administrative Support Pool 367
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(29) Maintenance Supervisor 9 $67,284
(30) Institutional Printer 7 $64,696
(31) Inventory Control Manager 5 $62,208
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
(32) Medical Billing Specialist 64 $62,208
(33) Public Information Technician 9 $62,208
(34) Medical Records Technician 11 $59,815
(35) Storeroom Supervisor 9 $57,515
(36) Patient Account Specialist 11 $53,175
(37) Cashier 55 $51,130
(38) Inventory Control Technician 14 $51,130
(39) Housekeeper 25 $49,164
(40) Child Care Technician 183 $45,455
(41) Mail Services Assistant 7 $45,455
(42) Caregiver 20 $43,706
(43) Cook 45 $43,706
(44) Institutional Services Assistant 108 $42,025
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(45) Faculty Pool 1,551
Distinguished Professor $567,260
Professor $392,183
Associate Professor $359,501
Assistant Professor $339,892
Instructor $269,448
Research Instructor $269,448
Research Professor $237,829
Family Practice Coordinator $237,616
Associate Family Practice Coord. $231,161
Associate Research Professor $224,720
Assistant Family Practice Coord. $218,249
Assistant Research Professor $212,176
(46) Department Chairperson 30 $562,128
(47) Educational Support Pool 297
Instructional Dev. Specialist II $175,351
Education Coordinator $171,912
Clinic Instructor $149,939
Instructional Dev. Specialist I $142,209
Educational Dev. Specialist I $113,031
Clinic Assistant Instructor $107,235
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
(48) Library Pool 24
Librarian $155,540
Senior Librarian Assistant $135,557
Associate Librarian $135,557
Assistant Librarian $122,222
Library Supervisor $65,197
Library Specialist $55,731
Library Technician $51,526
Library Support Assistant $47,639
(49) Research Support Pool 427
Research Associate $142,209
Post Doctoral Fellow $122,222
Senior Research Assistant $115,289
Biostatistician $112,380
Research Technologist $78,713
Research Project Analyst $72,774
Graduate Assistant $57,380
Research Technician $53,175
(50) Resident 1,060 $100,171
(51) Pharmacy Resident 17 $96,402
(52) Trainee 9 $36,701
PATIENT CARE POSITIONS
(53) Medical Services 408
Clinic Director $317,246
Director of Pharmacy $250,632
Asst. Dir. of Pharmacy $240,066
Director of University Hospital $223,498
Assoc. Adm. Patient Care $219,588
Patient Care Administrator $219,070
Clinical Laboratory Manager $218,575
Associate Director of Hospital $201,768
Clinical Services Manager $193,412
Assistant Director of Hospital $182,210
Biomedical Instrument Engineer $175,351
Poison Control Specialist $167,962
Director of Clinic Nursing $163,114
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Asst. Adm. Patient Care $157,053
Director of Medical Records $151,363
Hospital Financial Manager $145,501
Biomedical Equipment Tech II $142,208
Medical Services Admin. $132,052
Research/Clinical Programs Manager $128,986
Manager Medical Ancillary Services $108,136
Biomedical Equipment Tech I $107,234
Clinical Interpreter $106,311
Medical Services Mgr. $101,168
RN Clinical Coordinator $94,592
Lab Mgr. Adm. $93,419
Dietician $72,774
Medical Diagnostic Analyst $62,208
Hospital Program Services Asst. $55,302
Dietetic Technician $53,175
Hospital Technician $53,175
(54) Nursing Services 3,226
Senior Nurse Anesthetist $270,964
Nurse Anesthetist $202,744
Registered Nurse IV $193,412
Physician Assistant $180,855
Advanced Practice Registered Nurse $176,638
Specialty Registered Nurse $176,638
Registered Nurse III $160,468
Certified Nurse Practitioner III $154,819
Clinical Nursing Specialist II $145,267
Head Nurse $145,267
Nurse In-Service Instructor $134,709
Clinical Nursing Specialist I $134,709
Certified Nurse Practitioner II $134,626
Registered Nurse II $126,659
Registered Nurse I $119,679
Medical Assistant $116,326
Certified Nurse Practitioner I $112,439
LPN II $90,844
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Nursing Unit Coordinator $83,170
Patient Services Associate $76,011
LPN I $73,574
Patient Care Technician $59,316
Certified Nursing Assistant $53,175
(55) Medical Ancillary Support 1,714
Pharmacy Specialist $233,693
Pharmacist III $229,707
Pharmacist II $222,268
Pharmacist I $193,154
Medical Imaging Electrical Engineer $182,520
Audiologist $170,491
Certified Technologist III $147,599
Medical Technologist III $146,469
Registered Dietitian $145,487
Nutritionist $144,762
Clinical Laboratory Supv. $135,164
Respiratory Therapist Supervisor $126,660
Clinical Technician III $126,659
X-Ray Technician III $120,956
Special Procedures Technician $116,325
Certified Procedure Coding Spec. $116,325
Medical Technologist II $114,806
Certified Technologist II $112,439
X-Ray Technician II $107,715
Certified Technologist I $105,606
Medical Technologist I $104,773
Med Lab Technician $101,594
Clinical Technician II $98,899
X-Ray Technician I $94,467
Lab Technician III $78,161
Clinical Technician I $77,064
Point of Service Coordinator $77,064
Health Information Svs. Analyst II $53,527
Health Information Svs. Analyst I $46,838
Laboratory Assistant $40,722
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
(56) Rehabilitation Therapy Pool 148
Dir. of Rehabilitation Services $181,453
Dir. of Occupational Therapy $157,785
Dir. of Physical Therapy $157,785
Physical Therapist $143,972
Occupational Therapist $137,203
Speech Therapist $137,203
Physical Therapist Assistant $121,239
(57) Psychiatry Pool 165
Mental Health Professional II $122,223
Mental Health Professional I $115,290
Health Services Specialist II $55,302
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(58) Food Service Pool 113
Food Preparation Manager $64,696
Food Preparation Supervisor $57,515
Food Preparation Coordinator $51,130
Food Preparation Specialist $43,706
Food Preparation Technician $40,409
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 12,761

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be
known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such
purposes: one thousand five hundred sixty-five (1,565) temporary or part-
time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in
the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this
act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be payable from the
University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $112,539,654
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 17,709,805
(03) FUNDED DEPRECIATION 1,193,320
(04) UAMS REGIONAL CAMPUSES 6,561,549
(05) POISON AND DRUG INFORMATION CENTER 1,828,587
(06) UAMS NORTHWEST ARK. MEDICAL SCHOOL 3,434,664
(07) GRANTS TO CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL,
REGULAR SALARIES AND OPERATING
EXPENSES FOR INDIGENT CARE 6,136,368
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $149,403,947

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be payable from cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,100,000,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,000,000
(03) OVERTIME 20,000,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 275,000,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 705,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000,000
(C) PROF. FEES 45,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 85,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 150,000,000
(07) DEBT SERVICE 50,000,000
(08) FUND TRANSFERS, REFUNDS AND
INVESTMENTS 40,000,000
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
(09) CHILDREN'S JUSTICE ACT 250,000
(10) WAR MEMORIAL PARKING FEES 50,000
(11) INDIGENT CARE & BREAST CANCER
RESEARCH PROGRAM GRANTS/AID 10,000,000
(12) PHARMACY STUDENT LOANS 550,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,520,850,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - NURSING/MEDICAL LOANS AND SCHOLARSHIPS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for
loans and/or scholarships for rural nursing and advanced nursing match, rural
medical practice and community match, all as may be authorized by law, of the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADVANCED NURSING PRACTICE COMMUNITY
MATCH STUDENT LOAN AND SCHOLARSHIP
PROGRAM LOANS AND/OR SCHOLARSHIPS $150,000
(02) RURAL ADVANCED NURSING PRACTICE
STUDENT LOAN AND SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
LOANS AND/OR SCHOLARSHIPS 150,000
(03) RURAL MEDICAL PRACTICE STUDENT LOAN AND
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM LOANS AND/OR
SCHOLARSHIPS 300,000
(04) COMMUNITY MATCH STUDENT LOAN AND
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM LOANS AND/OR
SCHOLARSHIPS 150,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $750,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - BREAST CANCER RESEARCH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be
payable from the Breast Cancer Research Fund, for allocation to the Breast
Cancer Research Program for education, outreach, research and grants related
to the cause, cure, treatment, prevention and earlier detection of breast
cancer, for the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the fiscal
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BREAST CANCER RESEARCH PROGRAM
EXPENSES $1,694,216

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - POISON AND DRUG INFORMATION CENTER. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences,
to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for providing
additional support for the Arkansas Poison and Drug Information Center of the
College of Pharmacy of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADDITIONAL SUPPORT FOR THE ARKANSAS
POISON AND DRUG INFORMATION CENTER $299,959

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER PROGRAMS AND
GRANTS. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences, to be payable from the Domestic Peace Fund, for operations
of domestic violence shelter programs and statewide grants to domestic
violence shelters by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences -
Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER PROGRAMS $2,000,000
(02) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER GRANTS 1,050,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,050,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CHILD ABUSE AND NEGLECT PROGRAMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to
be payable from the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund, for child
abuse and neglect expenses and grants of the University of Arkansas for
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Medical Sciences - Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FOR EXPENSES ASSOCIATED WITH CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT PROGRAMS, INCLUDING
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, GRANTS TO STATE
AGENCIES, CHILD ADVOCACY CENTERS,
CHILD SAFETY CENTERS, AND OTHER
ELIGIBLE ENTITIES $1,000,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - PSYCHIATRIC RESEARCH INSTITUTE AND
DEPARTMENT OF PEDIATRICS. There is hereby appropriated, to the University of
Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be payable from the University of Arkansas
Medical Center Fund, for personal services, operating expenses, and grants of
the Building Effective Services for Trauma programs for children and
adolescents by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PSYCHIATRIC RESEARCH INSTITUTE
EXPENSES FOR TRAINING, TREATMENT,
COMMUNITY PROVIDERS, & PERSONAL
SERVICES $1,393,325
(02) DEPARTMENT OF PEDIATRICS EXPENSES FOR
TRAINING, TREATMENT, & ADVOCATE
EDUCATION 521,951
(03) DEPARTMENT OF PEDIATRICS EXPENSES FOR
MEDICAL EXAMINATION, CONSULTATION,
EDUCATION, & TRAINING 208,781
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,124,057

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - UAMS - HEALTH DATA INITIATIVE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
be payable from the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund, for personal
services, operating expenses and grants of the University of Arkansas for
Medical Sciences - Health Data Initiative for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS HEALTH DATA INITIATIVE $802,879

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - NEWBORN UMBILICAL CORD BLOOD PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the Newborn Umbilical Cord Blood Initiative
Fund, for personal services, operating expenses, travel, grants, and
contracts of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences - Newborn
Umbilical Cord Blood Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NEWBORN UMBILICAL CORD BLOOD
PROGRAM PERSONAL SERVICES AND
OPERATING EXPENSES $796,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - COLORECTAL CANCER SCREENING AND RESEARCH.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund,
for personal services, operating expenses, programmatic and other costs
associated with the research and screening of colorectal cancer by the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COLORECTAL CANCER SCREENING & RESEARCH $5,000,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - ADULT SICKLE CELL DISEASE PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences,
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
to be payable from the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of establishing and operating Sickle
Cell Clinics and Outreach Efforts of the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences - Adult Sickle Cell Disease Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADULT SICKLE CELL DISEASE PROGRAM
INITIATIVE PERSONAL SERVICES AND
OPERATING EXPENSES $379,993

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - CERTIFIED NURSE MIDWIFERY PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences,
to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the certified nurse midwifery program of
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CERTIFIED NURSE MIDWIFERY
PROGRAM PERSONAL SERVICES AND
OPERATING EXPENSES $500,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - WINTHROP P. ROCKEFELLER CANCER INSTITUTE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences, to be payable from the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences
National Cancer Institute Designation Trust Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences -
Winthrop P. Rockefeller Cancer Institute for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $18,503,906
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
(02) OVERTIME 15,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,181,094
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 6,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 300,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 4,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 6,000,000
(06) WPRCI CONNECT NURSE NAVIGATION
PROGRAM EXPENSES 1,350,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $41,350,000

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS - PANS/PANDAS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be
payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal
services and operating expenses of the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences - PANS/PANDAS Clinic and Programs for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PERSONAL SERVICES AND OPERATING EXPENSES
OF PANS/PANDAS CLINIC AND PROGRAMS $175,000

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS BREAST MILK BANK. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be
payable from the Breast Milk Bank Special Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences -
Arkansas Breast Milk Bank for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS BREAST MILK BANK PERSONAL
SERVICES AND OPERATING EXPENSES $1,700,000
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - MATERNAL HEALTH WORKFORCE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be
payable from the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Maternal Health
Workforce Trust Fund, for financial aid and programs in education and
training for the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Maternal Health
Workforce for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MATERNAL HEALTH WORKFORCE FINANCIAL AID AND
PROGRAMS IN EDUCATION AND TRAINING EXPENSES $2,000,000

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUNDING
TRANSFER NCI DESIGNATION TRUST FUND. (i) From time to time at the request of
the Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences or his or
her designee, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or
her books and those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor of the State funds
from the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund or from cash funds
payable from the Appropriation – Cash Funds in this Act to the National
Cancer Institute Designation Trust Fund. (ii) No fund transfer authorized in
subsection (i) herein shall be implemented until the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State has determined sufficient funding is available to be transferred,
and the transfer has received prior review by the Arkansas Legislative
Council or, if meeting in Regular or Fiscal Session, the Joint Budget
Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 21. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE SHELTER GRANTS. The grants authorized in the Domestic Violence
Shelter Programs and Grants appropriation section of this act shall be
equally distributed to domestic violence shelters as determined by the
Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission. The Arkansas Child
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission may adopt rules and regulations to
carry out the intent of the General Assembly regarding the grant
appropriations authorized in the Domestic Violence Shelter Programs and
Grants appropriation section of this act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 22. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. MEDICAL
SCHOOL LIMITATION. Nothing in this Act shall create an additional medical
school in the State of Arkansas, but it recognizes that appropriations,
funding and allocations in this Act may be used by the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences to support satellite campuses or programs outside the
City of Little Rock in order to conduct or continue training of its medical,
nursing, pharmacy and allied health students, as well as its medical
residents.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 23. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL AND TRANSFER AUTHORIZED. Thirty-three and one-third
percent (33-1/3%), in each fiscal year, of the amounts made available to fund
the appropriation in the Grants to Children's Hospital, Regular Salaries and
Operating Expenses for Indigent Care line item of the Operations
appropriation section of this Act shall be distributed to the Arkansas
Children's Hospital or Arkansas Children's Hospital may request that the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences transfer such funds each fiscal
year from the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund to the Department of
Human Services Grants Fund Account. The transferred funds shall be used to
match federal funds used for supplemental Medicaid payments to Arkansas
Children's Hospital.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 24. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD. Any unexpended balance of the general revenue funds provided by this
Act which remains at the close of a fiscal year, not to exceed ten percent
(10%) of funded appropriations, shall be carried forward and made available
for the same purposes for the next fiscal year.
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein,
may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 2026 the Agency shall by written statement set
forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the
Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source and a copy of the written request set forth
in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose, etc.
for which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty
(30) days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution
presents its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 25. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ESTABLISHMENT OF A "GROWTH POOL". (a) The Arkansas Division of Higher
Education shall establish and maintain for the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal
year a pool of three six hundred (300 600) non-classified positions. A
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
position established under this section shall not exceed the salary rate of
the highest maximum annual salary rate authorized by the General Assembly in
the institution's appropriation act. These positions are to be used by the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences in the event that the personal
services needs of the University during the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year
exceed the number of positions allocated to the University by the
Legislature. The University shall provide justification to the Arkansas
Division of Higher Education for the need to allocate titles from this
"growth pool". No classifications titles will be assigned to the pool until
such time as specific positions are requested by the University, approved by
the University Board or their designee, and approved by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee. Furthermore, the Arkansas Division of
Higher Education shall establish and maintain for the 2024-2025 fiscal year a
pool of three hundred (300) career service positions up to a C130. These
positions are to be used by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences
in the event that the personal services needs of the University during the
2024-2025 fiscal year exceed the number of positions in a classification
allocated to the University by the Legislature. The University shall provide
justification to the Arkansas Division of Higher Education for the need to
allocate titles from this "growth pool". No classifications will be assigned
to the pool until such time as specific positions are requested by the
University, recommended by the Arkansas Division of Higher Education, and
approved by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
(b) Determining the number of personnel to be employed by a state agency
is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating the maximum number of personnel by identifying the job titles and
the maximum grade or salary attached to those salaries. The General Assembly
has determined that the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences could be
operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that institution.
That flexibility is being accomplished by providing growth pools in
subsection (a) of this section and since the General Assembly has granted the
institution broad powers under the growth pool concept, it is both necessary
and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight of the
utilization of the growth pool by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee in the utilization of the growth pool.
Therefore, the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.
If the agency requests continuation of a "Growth Pool" position(s) as
established herein during the next fiscal year, the position(s) must be
requested as a new position(s) in the agency's budget request.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 26. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CHILD
HEALTH AND FAMILY LIFE INSTITUTE. The Child Health and Family Life Institute
shall be administered under the direction of Arkansas Children’s Hospital.
Arkansas Children’s Hospital shall enter into a cooperative agreement and/or
contract with the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences-Department of
Pediatrics for services required to deliver the programs of the Child Health
and Family Life Institute (CHFLI). Utilizing a multidisciplinary
collaboration of professionals, CHFLI shall provide a statewide effort to
explore, develop and evaluate new and better ways to address medically,
socially and economically interrelated health and developmental needs of
children with special health care needs and their families. CHFLI priorities
shall include, but are not limited to, wellness and prevention, screening and
diagnosis, treatment and intervention, training and education and research
and evaluation. Arkansas Children’s Hospital and the University of Arkansas
for Medical Sciences-Department of Pediatrics shall make annual reports to
the Arkansas Legislative Council on all matters of funding, existing programs
and services offered through CHFLI.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 27. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PARKING
FEES. On July 1 of each year the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences
shall pay from the appropriation provided herein from non-general revenue,
the total amount appropriated for War Memorial Parking Services from Fees to
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
War Memorial.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 28. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISIONS. Because the Rural Medical Practice Student Loan and Scholarship
Program Loans and/or Scholarships and the Community Match Student Loan and
Scholarship Program Loans and/or Scholarships have the goal of providing
primary care physicians in rural Arkansas, transfers may be made in such
amounts as are required between the line items made in the appropriation for
"Medical Loans and Scholarships".
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 29. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CLINICAL
EXPANSION AND RESEARCH POOL. (a) In order to address personnel needs emerging
from expanding medical research and patient care issues and the necessity of
recruiting and retaining qualified medical, research, and related support
personnel, the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences or its successor
is authorized for the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year a pool of seven hundred
(700) "Clinical Expansion and Research Pool" positions. These positions are
to be used by the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences in the event
that the personal services needs resulting from unanticipated clinical or
research programs that are initiated during the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal
year require additional positions, either in title, in classification, or in
number, that are not authorized or contemplated by the General Assembly in
the Regular Salaries - Operations section of this Act.
(b) The University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences is authorized to
access the "Clinical Expansion and Research Pool" positions authorized in
this Section at any time during the fiscal year when it is determined by the
Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, subject to the
review and approval by the Board of Trustees, that the need for additional
positions exists. Only medical or research positions shall be established
under this provision. The Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Medical Sciences shall provide a quarterly report detailing the justification
of allocation of positions from this "Clinical Expansion and Research Pool"
to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to the Arkansas Division of Higher
Education, and to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
for review. The report shall also include an accounting of the names, titles
and salaries of personnel who have been employed in positions established
from this pool and the source and duration of funds associated with the
positions.
(c) If the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences requests
continuation of any "Clinical Expansion and Research Pool" position(s) as
established herein during the next fiscal year, the position(s) must be
requested as a new position(s) in the agency's budget request.
(d) Determining the number of personnel to be employed by a state agency
is the prerogative of the General Assembly and is usually accomplished by
delineating the maximum number of personnel by identifying job titles and the
maximum grade or salary attached to those titles. The General Assembly has
determined that the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences could be
operated more efficiently if some flexibility is given to that institution.
That flexibility is being accomplished by providing a position pool in
Subsection (a) of this Section and since the General Assembly has granted the
agency broad powers under the growth pool concept, it is both necessary and
appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight of the utilization
of the position pool by requiring review of the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee in the utilization of the position pool. Therefore, the
requirement of review by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is
not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of review by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 30. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ABUSED
CHILDREN AND ADOLESCENTS SERVICES PROGRAM FUNDING PROVISION. In the event
the amount of general revenue distributed to the University of Arkansas
Medical Center Fund for the Department of Pediatrics and the Psychiatric
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128
Research Institute each fiscal year is at least equal to the amount
distributed during the 2012-13 fiscal year, an amount not less than seven
hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) shall be allocated and made available as
follows: four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000) each fiscal year
shall be made available exclusively to support the purposes and goals to
improve screening, monitoring and care for abused children and adolescents
through the Child Safety Centers or the University of Arkansas for Medical
Sciences as referred by the Child Safety Centers. Maintenance of statewide
screening and assessment protocols as well as evidence-based training of
mental health professionals are to be considered critical components of the
overall goals. For the provision of assessment and therapeutic services,
these funds are to be provided to the Child Safety Centers through contracts
from the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences. The contracts will
stipulate the terms of the agreement and reporting requirements; an amount
not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) may be utilized for
administrative costs as may be necessary to administer the program or if
determined not to be needed for administrative costs may be placed in reserve
for future needs of the program. The remaining two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000) shall be allocated and made available to the Department of
Pediatrics for expenses for medical examinations, consultation, education and
training as stipulated in the terms of agreement between the Chancellor of
the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences and the Department of
Pediatrics.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 31. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.
03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB128

SECTION 32. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 33. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee













03-17-2025 16:22:29 HAR039